Wyoming, session 2025, SF0009.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 1-11-102, 7-13-105(a)(intro),
(b)(intro), (ii), (c)(i), (ii), (d), (e)(ii), (f), (g)(i),
(ii), by creating a new paragraph (iii) and by creating new
subsections (h) and (j) and 25-1-104(k) are amended to
read:
1-11-102. Convicted felon disqualified.
A person who has been convicted of any felony is
disqualified to act as a juror unless his conviction is
reversed or annulled, he receives a pardon or his rights
are restored pursuant to W.S. 7-13-105(a) or (f).
7-13-105. Certificate of restoration of rights;
procedure for restoration in general; procedure for
restoration of voting rights for nonviolent felonies;
filing requirements.
(a) Subject to subsections (h) and (j) of this
section, upon receipt of a written application, the
governor may issue to a person convicted of a felony under
the laws of a state or the United States a certificate
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
which restores the rights lost pursuant to W.S. 6-10-106
when:
(b) Subject to subsections (h) and (j) of this
section, the department of corrections shall issue a
certificate of restoration of voting rights as provided in
this subsection and subsection (c) of this section. Upon
issuance of a certificate, voting rights lost pursuant to
W.S. 6-10-106 shall be deemed restored. The department of
corrections shall automatically issue a person convicted of
a nonviolent felony or nonviolent felonies arising out of
the same occurrence or related course of events a
certificate of restoration of voting rights if:
(ii) The person has completed all of his
sentence, including probation or parole, and before
conviction the person had the right to vote or would have
had the right to vote upon attaining the age of eighteen
(18) years.
(c) The department of corrections shall issue a
certificate of restoration of voting rights to eligible
persons as follows:
(i) For persons convicted within Wyoming of a
nonviolent felony or nonviolent felonies under the laws of
the state of Wyoming arising out of the same occurrence or
related course of events who completed their sentence
before January 1, 2010, the department shall require
receipt of a written request on a form prescribed by the
department and issue each eligible person a certificate of
restoration of voting rights following a determination that
the person has completed his sentence, including probation
and parole. The department shall not require an application
for restoration before issuing a certificate to eligible
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
persons who complete their sentence on and after January 1,
2010;
(ii) For persons convicted outside of Wyoming or
under federal law of a nonviolent felony or nonviolent
felonies under the laws of another state arising out of the
same occurrence or related course of events, the department
shall issue each eligible person a certificate of
restoration of voting rights upon receipt of a written
request on a form prescribed by the department and
following a determination that the person has completed his
sentence, including probation and parole.
(d) The department of correction's determination that
a person is ineligible for a certificate of restoration of
voting rights under subsections (b), (c) or (f) of this
section is a final action of the agency subject to judicial
review. The clerk of the district court and the division of
criminal investigation shall cooperate with the department
of corrections in providing information necessary for
determining a person's eligibility to receive a certificate
of restoration of voting rights. The department of
corrections shall notify the secretary of state when any
person's voting rights have been restored. If the person
was convicted in Wyoming, The department of corrections
shall submit the certificate of restoration of voting
rights to the clerk of the district court in which the
person was convicted and the clerk shall file the
certificate in the criminal case in which the conviction
was entered.
(e) As used in this section:
(ii) "Violent felony" means as defined by W.S.
6-1-104(a)(xii), including offenses committed in another
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
jurisdiction state which if committed in this state would
constitute a violent felony under W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii).
"Nonviolent felony" includes all felony offenses not
otherwise defined as violent felonies.
(f) Subject to subsections (h) and (j) of this
section, all other rights a person has lost pursuant to
W.S. 6-10-106 shall be restored five (5) years after the
person has completed their sentence, including applicable
periods of probation or parole. A person shall only be
eligible for restoration of their rights under this
subsection if the person has not been convicted of any
other felony other than convictions arising out of the same
occurrence or related course of events for which
restoration of rights is to be certified. The date on which
all rights are restored under this subsection shall be
noted on a certificate issued by the department which shall
be the same certificate issued under subsections (b) and
(c) of this section if the certificate is issued on or
after July 1, 2023, or a separate certificate issued upon
receipt of a written request on a form prescribed by the
department for a person eligible for restoration of rights
under this subsection prior to July 1, 2023. A conviction
for a new felony upon the issuance of any certificate under
this section shall render the certificate void in
accordance with subsection (h) of this section.
(g) When a certificate of restoration of rights is
issued pursuant to subsections (a) or (f) of this section,
the department of corrections shall:
(i) Notify the federal bureau of alcohol,
tobacco, and firearms when any person's right to use or
possess any firearm have been restored pursuant to
subsections (a) or (f) of this section and explosives;
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) File a copy of the certificate with the
secretary of state;.
(iii) Notify the division of criminal
investigation.
(h) Upon conviction of a new felony under the laws of
the state of Wyoming, the laws of another state or federal
law on or after the date a certificate of restoration of
rights is issued under this section, the certificate shall
automatically be void and all rights that were deemed
restored by the certificate shall no longer be deemed
restored.
(j) A person shall only be eligible for a certificate
of restoration of rights under this section as follows:
(i) Under subsection (a) of this section if the
person was convicted of a felony under the laws of the
state of Wyoming or another state;
(ii) For purposes of the restoration of rights
to possess a firearm, under subsection (f) of this section
if the person was convicted of a nonviolent felony or
nonviolent felonies arising out of the same occurrence or
related course of events under the laws of the state of
Wyoming;
(iii) Under subsections (b) and (c) of this
section if the person was convicted of a nonviolent felony
or nonviolent felonies arising out of the same occurrence
or related course of events under the laws of the state of
Wyoming or another state.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0009
ENROLLED ACT NO. 52, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
25-1-104. Creation of department of corrections;
duties; inspections of state institutions; regulation of
prisoner produced goods.
(k) The department of corrections shall issue
certificates of restoration of voting rights pursuant to
W.S. 7-13-105(b), and (c), (f) and (j).
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6